Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Article 17. Transition Provisions.

§79-4-17.01.
Application to existing domestic corporation.

Section 79-4-1.01 et seq. applies to all domestic corporations in existence on its effective date that were incorporated under any general statute of this state providing for incorporation of corporations for profit if power to amend or repeal the statute under which the corporation was incorporated was reserved.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 17.01, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Holmes, The revised Model Business Corporation Act and corporate law reform in Mississippi.
57 Miss. L. J. 271, August, 1987.

§79-4-17.02.
Application to qualified foreign corporations.

A foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state on the effective date of Sections 79-4-1.01 et seq. is subject to Sections 79-4-1.01 et seq. but is not required to obtain a new certificate of authority to transact business under Sections 79-4-1.01 et seq.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 17.02, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

§79-4-17.03.
Saving provisions.

Except as provided in subsection (b), the repeal of a statute by Sections 79-4-1.01 et seq. does not affect:

The operation of the statute or any action taken under it before its repeal;

Any ratification, right, remedy, privilege, obligation or liability acquired, accrued or incurred under the statute before its repeal;

Any violation of the statute, or any penalty, forfeiture or punishment incurred because of the violation, before its repeal;

Any proceeding, reorganization or dissolution commenced under the statute before its repeal, and the proceeding, reorganization or dissolution may be completed in accordance with the statute as if it had not been repealed.

If a penalty or punishment imposed for violation of a statute repealed by Sections 79-4-1.01 et seq. is reduced by Sections 79-4-1.01 et seq., the penalty or punishment if not already imposed shall be imposed in accordance with Sections 79-4-1.01 et seq.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 17.03, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

§79-4-17.04.
Severability.

If any provision of Sections 79-4-1.01 et seq. or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of Sections 79-4-1.01 et seq. that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of Sections 79-4-1.01 et seq. are severable.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 17.04, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

§79-4-17.05.
Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

In the event that any provisions of this chapter are deemed to modify, limit or supersede the Federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 USCS Section 7001 et seq., the provisions of this chapter shall control to the maximum extent permitted by Section 102(a)(2) of that federal act.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2012, ch. 481, § 47, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

Section 102(a)(2) of the Federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, see 15 U.S.C. § 7002(a)(2).